Wisconsin, session 2025, AB820.
do enact as follows:AB820,11Section 1. 15.405 (6m) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB820,3,2115.405 (6m) (a) Three Two hearing instrument specialists licensed under 2subch. I of ch. 459.AB820,23Section 2. 15.405 (6m) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:AB820,3,5415.405 (6m) (e) Two public members. One of the public members shall be a 5hearing aid user, an osseo-integrated device user, or a cochlear implant user.AB820,36Section 3. 459.20 (2) of the statutes is renumbered 459.20 (3o) (a) and 7amended to read:AB820,3,88459.20 (3o) (a) “Audiology” “Practice of audiology” means all of the following:AB820,3,1491. Applying principles, methods, or procedures of prevention, identification, 10evaluation, diagnosis, management, and treatment of auditory or vestibular 11conditions, including consultation, intervention, instruction or research related to 12hearing, vestibular function, or any abnormal condition related to tinnitus, 13auditory sensitivity, acuity, function or processing, speech, language or other 14aberrant behavior resulting from hearing loss of the human auditory system.AB820,3,16152. Engaging in the practice of prescribing, ordering, selling, dispensing, or 16externally fitting, and dealing in hearing aids. any of the following:AB820,417Section 4. 459.20 (3o) (a) 2. a., b. and c. of the statutes are created to read:AB820,3,1918459.20 (3o) (a) 2. a. Prescription hearing aids or over-the-counter hearing 19aids.AB820,3,2120b. Nonsurgical external units that attach to osseo-integrated devices for the 21correction or relief of a condition for which osseo-integrated devices are worn.AB820,3,2322c. Cochlear implants for the correction or relief of a condition for which 23cochlear implants are worn.AB820,524Section 5. 459.20 (3o) (b) and (c) of the statutes are created to read:AB820,4,11459.20 (3o) (b) “Practice of audiology” includes all of the following:AB820,4,221. Conducting health screenings.AB820,4,432. Removal of cerumen from the external auditory canal that is not impacted 4to the point that removal requires anesthesia.AB820,4,653. Removal of a foreign body from the external auditory canal that is not 6impacted to the point that removal requires anesthesia.AB820,4,874. Ordering of cultures and blood work testing as it relates to the auditory or 8vestibular conditions in the human ear.AB820,4,1195. Ordering and performing of in-office, nonradiographic scanning or imaging 10of the external auditory canal and the ordering of radiographic imaging for 11auditory or vestibular conditions in the human ear.AB820,4,12126. Ordering of genetic testing for auditory or vestibular conditions.AB820,4,14137. Ordering of prescription medication for the treatment of conditions of the 14external ear or the external auditory canal.AB820,4,1515(c) “Practice of audiology” does not include any of the following:AB820,4,19161. Surgery using an instrument, including a laser, scalpel, needle, cautery, 17cryoprobe, or suture in which human tissue is cut, burned, vaporized, removed, or 18otherwise permanently altered by mechanical means, laser, ionization, radiation, 19ultrasound, or other means.AB820,4,20202. Osseo-integrated device surgery.AB820,4,21213. Cochlear implant surgery.AB820,4,23224. Preparation, operation, performance, or interpretation of radiographic 23imaging.AB820,624Section 6. 459.24 (3) (em) of the statutes is repealed.AB820,71Section 7. 459.24 (6) (b) 1. and (c) of the statutes are amended to read:AB820,5,82459.24 (6) (b) 1. Upon application, the examining board may grant a 3temporary license to practice audiology during the completion of the postgraduate 4fellowship required under sub. (3) (f) if the applicant practices under the 5supervision of an audiologist licensed under sub. (3), and satisfies the requirements 6under sub. (3) (a) to (d), and has submitted an application to take the next available 7examinations for licensure as an audiologist under s. 459.26 (2) (b). No license may 8be issued under this paragraph after December 31, 2009.AB820,5,199(c) A temporary license granted under this subsection is valid for a period 10designated in rules promulgated by the examining board. The rules may designate 11a period that terminates if an applicant fails to take the next available examination 12under s. 459.26 (2) (a) or (b) for reasons other than inaction by the examining board 13or hardship. A temporary license granted under par. (a) may be renewed once by 14the examining board. A temporary license granted under par. (b) may be renewed 15once by the examining board if the applicant fails an examination for audiologist 16licensure under s. 459.26 (2) (b) and applies to take the next available examination 17or if the applicant shows, to the satisfaction of the examining board, sufficient cause 18for the renewal. An applicant for a temporary license shall pay the fee specified in 19s. 440.05 (6).AB820,820Section 8. 459.26 (2) (b) of the statutes is repealed.AB820,921Section 9. 459.26 (2) (c) of the statutes is repealed.AB820,1022Section 10. 459.26 (3) of the statutes is repealed.AB820,1123Section 11. 459.28 (1) (b) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB820,6,224459.28 (1) (b) 1. The requirements for licensure in the other state or territory 1are substantially equivalent to the requirements under s. 459.24 (3) (c), and (e), and 2(em).AB820,123Section 12. HAS 6.04 (8) of the administrative code is repealed.AB820,134Section 13. Initial applicability.AB820,6,75(1) The treatment of s. 15.405 (6m) (a) first applies on the date on which the 6term of any of the members appointed to the hearing and speech examining board 7under s. 15.405 (6m) (a) expires.AB820,148Section 14. Effective date.AB820,6,109(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 7th month beginning after 10publication.AB820,6,1111